Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.757

Public printing for state agencies and municipal corporations—Quality and workmanship requirements.

Nothing in RCW 43.19.748, 43.19.751, and 43.19.754 shall be construed as requiring any public official to accept any such work of inferior quality or workmanship.

[ 2015 c 225 s 70; 1965 c 8 s 43.78.160. Prior: 1919 c 80 s 4; RRS s 10338. Formerly RCW 43.78.160.]

NOTES: